District of Columbia statutes.
21-104

Termination of guardianship of the person.

A natural guardianship or an appointive guardianship of the person of an infant ceases when said infant becomes 18 years of age or marries.

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 738, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
July 22, 1976, D.C. Law 1-75, § 4(d), 23 DCR 1181
Apr. 7, 1977, D.C. Law 1-107, title I, § 115, 23 DCR 8737

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-104.
1973 Ed., § 21-104.